Washington statutes.
RCW 2.32.090

Clerk not to practice law.

Each clerk of a court is prohibited during his or her continuance in office from acting, or having a partner who acts, as an attorney of the court of which he or she is clerk.

[ 2011 c 336 s 46; 1891 c 57 s 5; RRS s 81. Prior: Code 1881 s 2183; 1854 p 367 s 10.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: SAR 16(3).